tr: LED renk seçenekleri: Mavi; Yeşil; Çok renkli; Turuncu; Mor; Kırmızı; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
lt-LT: LED spalvų pasirinkimai: Mėlyna; Žalia; Įvairiaspalvė; Oranžinė; Violetinė; Raudona; Balta; Geltona; Kita
es: Opciones de color de luces LED: Azul; Verde; Multicolor; Naranja; Morado; Rojo; Blanco; Amarillo; Otro
zh-TW: LED 顏色選項: 藍色; 綠色; 多色; 橙色; 紫色; 紅色; 白色; 黃色; 其他
en: LED color options: Blue; Green; Multicolor; Orange; Purple; Red; White; Yellow; Other
th: ตัวเลือกสี LED: สีน้ำเงิน; สีเขียว; หลากหลายสี; สีส้ม; สีม่วง; สีแดง; สีขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: LED opções de cor: Azul; Verde; Multicolorido; Laranja; Roxo; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
nb: Tilgjengelige LED-farger: Blå; Grønn; Flerfarget; Oransje; Lilla; Rød; Hvit; Gul; Annet
de: LED-Farboptionen: Blau; Grün; Mehrfarbig; Orange; Lila; Rot; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstige
it: Opzioni di colore LED: Blu; Verde; Multicolore; Arancione; Viola; Rosso; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
pt-PT: Opções de cores de LED: Azul; Verde; Multicor; Laranja; Roxo; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
sk-SK: Možnosti farieb LED diód: Modrá; Zelená; Viacfarebná; Oranžová; Fialová; Červená; Biela; Žltá; Iné
hr-HR: Opcije boja LED dioda: Plava; Zelena; Višebojna; Narančasta; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
hu: LED színopciók: Kék; Zöld; Többszínű; Narancssárga; Lila; Piros; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
fi: LED-värivaihtoehdot: Sininen; Vihreä; Monivärinen; Oranssi; Violetti; Punainen; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
vi: Các tùy chọn màu đèn LED: màu xanh dương; màu xanh lá cây; Nhiều màu; màu cam; màu tím; màu đỏ; màu trắng; màu vàng; Khác
bg-BG: Опции за LED цветове: Син; Зелен; Многоцветен; Оранжев; Лилав; Червен; Бял; Жълт; Друг
el: Επιλογές χρώματος LED: Μπλε; Πράσινο; Πολύχρωμο; Πορτοκαλί; Μοβ; Κόκκινο; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
sv: Färgalternativ för LED: Blå; Grön; Flerfärgad; Orange; Lila; Röd; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
fr: Options de couleur des LED: Bleu; Vert; Multicolore; Orange; Violet; Rouge; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
cs: Možnosti LED barev: Modrá; Zelená; Vícebarevná; Oranžová; Purpurová; Červená; Bílá; Žlutá; Jiné
zh-CN: LED 颜色选项: 蓝色; 绿色; 多色; 橙色; 紫色; 红色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
ru: Варианты цвета LED-подсветки: Синий; Зеленый; Многоцветный; Оранжевый; Фиолетовый; Красный; Белый; Желтый; Другое
pl: Opcje kolorów LED: Niebieski; Zielony; Wielokolorowy; Pomarańczowy; Fioletowy; Czerwony; Biały; Żółty; Inne
sl-SI: Možnosti LED barv: Modra; Zelena; Večbarvna; Oranžna; Vijolična; Rdeča; Bela; Rumena; Drugo
ko: LED 색상 옵션: 파란색; 녹색; 다색; 주황색; 보라색; 빨간색; 흰색; 노란색; 기타
da: LED-farvemuligheder: Blå; Grøn; Flerfarvet; Orange; Lilla; Rød; Hvid; Gul; Andet
ja: LED色のオプション: 青; 緑; マルチカラー; オレンジ; 紫; 赤; 白; 黄色; その他
ro-RO: Opțiuni de culoare LED: Albastru; Verde; Multicolor; Portocaliu; Mov; Roșu; Alb; Galben; Altele
nl: LED kleuropties: Blauw; Groen; Meerkleurig; Oranje; Paars; Rood; Wit; Geel; Overig